California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The Sacramento County Board of Supervisors may, by resolution, designate another county officer to perform the duties of the county clerk pursuant to this chapter in and for the County of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 201, Sec. 3.   (SB 1462)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17910.

Every person who regularly transacts business in this state for profit under a fictitious business name shall do all of the following:

(a) File a fictitious business name statement in accordance with this chapter not later than 40 days from the time the registrant commences to transact such business.

(b) File a new statement after any change in the facts, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 17920.

(c) File a new statement when refiling a fictitious business name statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17910.5.

(a) No person shall adopt any fictitious business name which includes “Corporation,” “Corp.,” “Incorporated,” or “Inc.” unless that person is a corporation organized pursuant to the laws of this state or some other jurisdiction.

(b) No person shall adopt any fictitious business name that includes “Limited Liability Company” or “LLC” or “LC” unless that person is a limited liability company organized pursuant to the laws of this state or some other jurisdiction. A person is not
 prohibited from using the complete words “Limited” or “Company” or their abbreviations in the person’s business name as long as that use does not imply that the person is a limited liability company.

(c) A county clerk shall not accept a fictitious business name statement which would be in violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17911.

This chapter does not apply to a nonprofit corporation or association, including, but not limited to, organizations such as churches, labor unions, fraternal and charitable organizations, foundations, and similar organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17912.

This chapter does not apply to a real estate investment trust as defined in Section 23000 of the Corporations Code that has a statement on file, pursuant to Section 18200 of the Corporations Code, designating an agent for service of process or has qualified to do business under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17913.

(a) The fictitious business name statement shall contain all of the information required by this subdivision and shall be substantially in the following form:FICTITIOUS BUSINESS NAME STATEMENTThe following person (persons) is (are) doing business as*at ** :***This business is conducted by ****The registrant commenced to transact business under the fictitious business name or names listed above on*****I declare that all information in this statement is true and correct. (A registrant who declares as true any material matter pursuant to Section 17913 of the Business and Professions Code that the registrant knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).)Registrant signatureStatement filed with the County Clerk of ____ County on NOTICE—IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBDIVISION (a) OF SECTION 17920, A FICTITIOUS NAME
 STATEMENT GENERALLY EXPIRES AT THE END OF FIVE YEARS FROM THE DATE ON WHICH IT WAS FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY CLERK, EXCEPT, AS PROVIDED IN SUBDIVISION (b) OF SECTION 17920, WHERE IT EXPIRES 40 DAYS AFTER ANY CHANGE IN THE FACTS SET FORTH IN THE STATEMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 17913. A NEW FICTITIOUS BUSINESS NAME STATEMENT MUST BE FILED BEFORE THE EXPIRATION.

THE FILING OF THIS STATEMENT DOES NOT OF ITSELF AUTHORIZE THE USE IN THIS STATE OF A FICTITIOUS BUSINESS NAME IN VIOLATION OF THE RIGHTS OF ANOTHER UNDER FEDERAL, STATE, OR COMMON LAW (SEE SECTION 14411 ET SEQ., BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONS CODE).
(b) The fictitious business name statement shall contain the following information set forth in the manner indicated in the form provided
 by subdivision (a):

(1) Where the asterisk (*) appears in the form, insert the fictitious business name or names. Only those businesses operated at the same address and under the same ownership may be listed on one fictitious business name statement.

(2) Where the two asterisks (**) appear in the form: If the registrant has a place of business in this state, insert the street address, and county, of the registrant’s principal place of business in this state. If the registrant has no place of business in this state, insert the street address, and county, of the registrant’s principal place of business outside this state.

(3) Where the three asterisks (***) appear in the form: If the registrant is an individual, insert the
 registrant’s full name and business mailing address if it differs from the business address. If the registrants are a married couple, insert the full name and business mailing address of both parties to the marriage if it differs from the business address. If the registrant is a general partnership, copartnership, joint venture, or limited liability partnership, insert the full name and business mailing address of each general partner if it differs from the business address. If the registrant is a limited partnership, insert the full name and business mailing address of each general partner. If the registrant is a limited liability company, insert the name and business mailing address of the limited liability company, as set out in its articles of organization on file with the California Secretary of State, and the state of organization. If the registrant is a trust, insert the full name and business
 mailing address of each trustee. If the registrant is a corporation, insert the name and address of the corporation, as set out in its articles of incorporation on file with the California Secretary of State, and the state of incorporation. If the registrants are state or local registered domestic partners, insert the full name and business mailing address of each domestic partner if it differs from the business address. If the registrant is an unincorporated association other than a partnership, insert the name of each person who is interested in the business of the association and whose liability with respect to the association is substantially the same as that of a general partner.

(4) Where the four asterisks (****) appear in the form, insert whichever of the following best describes the nature of the business: (i) “an individual,”
 (ii) “a general partnership,” (iii) “a limited partnership,” (iv) “a limited liability company,” (v) “an unincorporated association other than a partnership,” (vi) “a corporation,” (vii) “a trust,” (viii) “copartners,” (ix) “a married couple,” (x) “joint venture,” (xi) “state or local registered domestic partners,” or (xii) “a limited liability partnership.”

(5) Where the five asterisks (*****) appear in the form, insert the date on which the registrant first commenced to transact business under the fictitious business name or names listed, if already transacting business under that name or names. If the registrant has not yet commenced to transact business under the fictitious business name or names listed, insert the statement, “Not applicable.”

(c) The registrant shall
 declare that all of the information in the fictitious business name statement is true and correct. A registrant who declares as true any material matter pursuant to this section that the registrant knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) (1) At the time of filing of the fictitious business name statement, the registrant filing on behalf of the registrant shall present personal identification in the form of a California driver’s license or other government identification acceptable to the county clerk to adequately determine the identity of the registrant filing on behalf of the registrant as provided in subdivision (e) and the county clerk may require the registrant to complete and sign an affidavit of identity.

(2) In the case of a registrant utilizing an agent for submission of the registrant’s fictitious business name statement for filing, at the time of filing of the fictitious business name statement, the agent filing on behalf of the registrant shall present personal identification in the form of a California driver’s license or other government identification acceptable to the county clerk to adequately determine the identity of the agent filing on behalf of the registrant as provided in subdivision (e). The county clerk may also require the agent to submit a notarized statement signed by the registrant declaring the registrant has authorized the agent to submit the filing on behalf of the registrant.

(e) If the registrant is a corporation, a limited liability company, a limited partnership, or a limited liability partnership, the county clerk
 may require documentary evidence issued by the California Secretary of State and deemed acceptable by the county clerk, indicating the current existence and good standing of that business entity to be attached to a completed and notarized affidavit of identity, for purposes of subdivision (d).

(f) (1) The county clerk may require a registrant that mails a fictitious business name statement to a county clerk’s office for filing to submit a completed and notarized affidavit of identity. A registrant that is a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or limited liability partnership, if required by the county clerk to submit an affidavit of identity, shall also submit documentary evidence issued by the California Secretary of State indicating the current existence and good standing of that business entity.

(2) The county clerk may accept an electronic acknowledgment verifying the identity of the registrant using a remote identity proofing process ensuring the registrant’s identification. The identity proofing process shall follow, to the extent reasonable, the federal guidelines for security and privacy and shall include dynamic knowledge-based authentication or an identity proofing method consistent with, at least, level 3 identity assurance, as described in the electronic authentication guidelines of the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(g) A county clerk that chooses to establish procedures pursuant to this section shall prescribe the form of affidavit of identity for filing by a registrant in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 77.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17914.

The fictitious business name statement shall be signed as follows:

(a) If the registrant is an individual, by the individual.

(b) If the registrants are a married couple, by either party to the marriage.

(c) If the registrant is a general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, copartnership, joint venture, or unincorporated association other than a partnership, by a general partner.

(d) If the registrant is a limited liability company, by a manager or officer.

(e) If the registrant is a trust, by a trustee.

(f) If the registrant is a corporation, by an officer.

(g) If the registrant is a state or local registered domestic partnership, by one of the domestic partners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 19.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17915.

A fictitious business name statement shall be filed with the clerk of the county in which the registrant has his or her principal place of business in this state or, if the registrant has no place of business in this state, with the Clerk of Sacramento County. This chapter does not preclude a person from filing a fictitious business name statement in a county other than that where the principal place of business is located, as long as the requirements of this section are also met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17916.

Presentation for filing of an original fictitious business name statement and one copy of the statement, with proper identification, accompanied by a completed and notarized affidavit of identity, if required by the county clerk, and other documents required in accordance with Section 17913, payment of the filing fee, and acceptance of the statement by the county clerk constitute filing under this chapter. The county clerk shall note on the copy the file number, the date of filing the original, and the date of expiration and shall certify and deliver the copy to the registrant or the registrant’s agent. A county clerk may use a remote identity proofing process as described in subdivision (f) of Section 17913 for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 15, Sec. 2.   (AB 716)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17917.

(a) Within 45 days after a fictitious business name statement has been filed pursuant to this chapter, the registrant shall cause a statement in the form prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 17913 to be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the fictitious business name statement was filed or, if there is no such newspaper in that county, in a newspaper of general circulation in an adjoining county. If the registrant does not have a place of business in this state, the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in Sacramento County.

(b) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (a), the newspaper selected for the publication of the statement should be one that circulates in the area where the business is to be conducted.

(c) If a refiling is required because the prior statement has expired, the refiling need not be published unless there has been a change in the information required in the expired statement, provided the refiling is filed within 40 days of the date the statement expired.

(d) An affidavit showing the publication of the statement shall be filed with the county clerk where the fictitious business name statement was filed within 45 days after the completion of the publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 72.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17918.

No person transacting business under a fictitious business name contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or his assignee, may maintain any action upon or on account of any contract made, or transaction had, in the fictitious business name in any court of this state until the fictitious business name statement has been executed, filed, and published as required by this chapter. For the purposes of this section, the failure to comply with subdivision (b) of Section 17917 does not constitute transacting business contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

17919.

(a) A fictitious business name statement may be executed, filed, and published by the trustee in bankruptcy at any time after bankruptcy where a failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter would otherwise preclude the maintenance of an action to recover any sums due to the debtor or bankruptcy estate or the partnership of which the debtor or bankruptcy estate was a member.

(b) A fictitious business name statement may be executed, filed, and published by the conservator, executor, or administrator at any time after the appointment of a conservator for or death of any individual or partner where a failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter would otherwise preclude the maintenance of an action to recover any sums due the conservatee or deceased
 person or the partnership of which they were a member.

(c) A fictitious business name statement may be executed, filed, and published by an assignee or purchaser of the business at any time after the assignment or sale where a failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter would otherwise preclude the maintenance of an action to recover any sums due to the assignee or purchaser by reason of the assignment or sale.

(d) The fictitious business name statement referred to in this section shall be in substantially the same form as prescribed in Section 17913, except:

(1) The person or persons who were doing
 business under the fictitious business name shall be stated as such person or persons existed (i) immediately before the bankruptcy, conservatorship, or death or the assignment or sale of the business or (ii) at the time they ceased to do business under the fictitious business name, whichever is the earlier time.

(2) The statement shall include the following additional sentence: “This statement has been executed pursuant to Section 17919 of the Business and Professions Code.”

(3) The person executing the statement shall (i) sign the statement on behalf of the person or persons formerly doing business under the fictitious business name, (ii) state
 their full name and the street address of their place of business or, if they have none, of their business mailing address, and (iii) indicate whether they are
 a trustee in bankruptcy, conservator, executor, or administrator or assignee or purchaser of the business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 20, Sec. 2.   (AB 878)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17920.

(a) Unless the statement expires earlier under subdivision (b) or (c), a fictitious business name statement expires five years from the date it was filed in the office of the county clerk.

(b) Except as provided in Section 17923, a fictitious business name statement expires 40 days after any change in the facts set forth in the statement pursuant to Section 17913.

(c) A fictitious business name statement expires when the registrant files a statement of abandonment of the fictitious business name described in the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 20, Sec. 3.   (AB 878)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17921.

Notice of the date of expiration shall be on the fictitious business name statement form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 581, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17922.

(a) Upon ceasing to transact business in this state under a fictitious business name that was filed in the previous five years, a registrant who has filed a fictitious business name statement shall file a statement of abandonment of use of fictitious business name. The statement of abandonment shall be executed in the same manner as a fictitious business name statement, excluding the requirements of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 17913 and shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which the registrant has filed the fictitious business name statement. The statement shall be published in the same manner as a fictitious business name statement and an affidavit showing its publication shall be filed with the county clerk after the completion of publication.

(b) The statement shall include:

(1) The name being abandoned and the street address of the principal place of business.

(2) The date on which the fictitious business name statement relating to the fictitious business name being abandoned was filed, the file number, and the county where filed.

(3) In the case of an individual, the full name and business mailing address of the individual.

(4) In the case of a married couple, the full name and
 business mailing address of both parties to the marriage.

(5) In the case of a general partnership, a limited partnership, copartners, a limited liability partnership, a joint venture, or an unincorporated association other than a partnership, the full names and business mailing addresses of all of the general partners.

(6) In the case of a corporation, the name and address of the corporation as set forth in its articles of incorporation on file with the California Secretary of State.

(7) In the case of a trust, the full name and
 business mailing address of each of the trustees.

(8) In the case of a limited liability company, the name and address of the limited liability company as set forth in its articles of organization on file with the California Secretary of State.

(9) In the case of state or local registered domestic partners, the full name and business mailing address of each domestic partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 20, Sec. 4.   (AB 878)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17923.

(a) Any registrant who is a general partner in a partnership that is or has been regularly transacting business under a fictitious business name may, upon withdrawing as a general partner, file a statement of withdrawal from the partnership operating under a fictitious business name. The statement of withdrawal shall be executed by the registrant filing the statement in the same manner as a fictitious business name statement, excluding the requirements of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 17913, and shall be filed with the county clerk of the county where the partnership filed its fictitious business name statement.

(b) The statement shall include:

(1) The fictitious business name of the
 partnership.

(2) The date on which the fictitious business name statement for the partnership was filed, the file number, and the county where filed.

(3) The street address of its principal place of business in this state or, if it has no place of business in this state, the street address of its principal place of business outside this state, if any.

(4) The full names and business mailing addresses of the registrant or registrants withdrawing as partners.

(c) The statement of withdrawal from the partnership operating under a fictitious business name
 shall be published in the same manner as the fictitious business name statement and an affidavit showing the publication of the statement shall be filed with the county clerk after the completion of the publication.

(d) The withdrawal of a general partner does not cause a fictitious business name statement to expire if the withdrawing partner files a statement of withdrawal meeting the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 20, Sec. 5.   (AB 878)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17924.

(a) The county clerk shall furnish without charge a form satisfying the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 17913. The form prepared by the county clerk, or the material provided by him with the form, shall include statements substantially as follows:
(1) “Your fictitious business name statement must be published in a newspaper once a week for four successive weeks and an affidavit of publication filed with the county clerk
 when publication has been accomplished. The statement should be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the principal place of business is located. The statement should be published in such county in a newspaper that circulates in the area where the business is to be conducted (Business and Professions Code Section 17917).”(2) “Any person who executes, files, or publishes any fictitious business name statement, knowing that such statement is false, in whole or in part, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) (Business and Professions Code Section 17930).”
These statements do not constitute a part of the fictitious business name statement and are not required to be published pursuant to Section 17917.

(b) The county clerk may furnish without charge forms meeting the requirements for a statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name and a statement of withdrawal from partnership operating under a fictitious business name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 118, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17925.

(a) The county clerk shall maintain one or more indices which permit the determination of at least the following information:

(1) Whether any business using a specific fictitious business name has on file a fictitious business name statement setting forth such name and, if so, the file number of the statement.

(2) Whether any individual, general partner, or corporation is listed in any fictitious business name statement on file and, if so, the file number of the statement.

(3) Whether a statement of abandonment of use of a specific business name is on file and, if so, the file number of the statement of abandonment.

(4) Whether a statement of withdrawal from a partnership operating under fictitious business name is on file and, if so, the file number of the statement of withdrawal.

(b) Four years after a fictitious business name statement has expired, the county clerk may delete the information concerning that statement from the index, including any references to statements of abandonment of use, statements of withdrawal of partnerships, or any other references related to a fictitious business name statement which is being deleted from the index.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17926.

(a) As used in this section, “statement” means a fictitious business name statement, a statement of abandonment of use of fictitious business name, or a statement of withdrawal from partnership operating under fictitious business name.

(b) For a fee of two dollars ($2), the county clerk shall provide any person who so requests a certified copy of any statement on file in his or her office.

(c) A copy of a
 statement, when certified as provided in subdivision (b), establishes a rebuttable presumption of all of the following:

(1) The existence of the original statement.

(2) The execution of the statement by the person by whom it purports to have been executed.

(3) The truth of the information required by Sections 17913, 17922, or 17923 that is contained in the statement.

(d) The presumptions established by subdivision (c) are presumptions affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(e) All of the provisions of this section are subject to Section 54985 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 716, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17927.

(a) The county clerk shall mark each fictitious business name statement with a file number and the date of filing and shall retain the original statement for his or her file. He or she may destroy or otherwise dispose of the statement, including proof of publication, affidavit of identity statement, the additional documents required by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 17913, and any other references related to the fictitious business name statement, four years after the statement expires.

(b) The county clerk shall mark each statement of abandonment of use of fictitious business name or statement of withdrawal from partnership operating under fictitious business name with a
 file number and the date of filing. He or she may destroy or otherwise dispose of the statement at the same time the fictitious business name statement to which it relates is destroyed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) In lieu of retaining the original statement, proof of publication, affidavit of identity statement, and additional documents that may be required pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 17913, and any other documents pertaining to the fictitious business statement on file, the county clerk may retain a copy of the statement in accordance with Section 26205.1 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 368, Sec. 10.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17928.

(a) Upon prepayment of the fee established pursuant to subdivision (b), the county clerk may furnish to any person who so requests daily or less frequent summaries or compilations of filings under this chapter.

(b) The fee for furnishing information under this section shall be fixed by the county clerk with the approval of the county board of supervisors and shall be sufficient to pay at least the actual cost of furnishing such information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

17929.

(a) The fee for filing a fictitious business name statement is ten dollars ($10) for the first fictitious business name and owner and two dollars ($2) for each additional fictitious business name or owner filed on the same statement and doing business at the same location. This fee covers the cost of filing and indexing the statement (and any affidavit of publication), the cost of furnishing one certified copy of the statement to the registrant filing the statement, acceptance, verification, and maintenance of the affidavit of identity statement and other documents or actions that may be required pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 17913, and the cost for notifying registrants of the pending expiration of their fictitious business name statement.

(b) The fee for filing a statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name is five dollars ($5). This fee covers the cost of filing and indexing the statement, the cost of any affidavit of publication, and the cost of furnishing one certified copy of the statement to the registrant filing the statement.

(c) The fee for filing a statement of withdrawal from partnership operating under a fictitious business name is five dollars ($5). This fee covers the cost of filing and indexing the statement, the cost of any affidavit of publication, and the cost of furnishing one certified copy of the statement to the registrant filing the statement.

(d) All of the provisions of this section are subject to Section 54985 of the Government Code.

(e) If the
 notice of pending expiration, as described in subdivision (a), is returned to the county clerk by the United States Postal Service as undeliverable, the county clerk is not required to retain the returned notice of pending expiration.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 368, Sec. 12.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17930.

Any person who executes, files, or publishes any statement under this chapter, knowing that such statement is false, in whole or in part, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 55.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Bots [17940. - 17943.]

17940.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Bot” means an automated online account where all or substantially all of the actions or posts of that account are not the result of a person.

(b) “Online” means appearing on any public-facing Internet Web site, Web application, or digital application, including a social network or publication.

(c) “Online platform” means any public-facing Internet Web site, Web application, or digital application, including a social network or publication, that has 10,000,000 or more unique monthly United States visitors or users for a majority of months during the preceding 12 months.

(d) “Person” means a natural person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, association, estate, trust, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or other legal entity or any combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 892, Sec. 1.   (SB 1001)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 17943.)
-------------------------------------------

17941.

(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to use a bot to communicate or interact with another person in California online, with the intent to mislead the other person about its artificial identity for the purpose of knowingly deceiving the person about the content of the communication in order to incentivize a purchase or sale of goods or services in a commercial transaction or to influence a vote in an election. A person using a bot shall not be liable under this section if the person discloses that it is a bot.

(b) The disclosure required by this section shall be clear, conspicuous, and reasonably designed to inform persons with whom the bot communicates or interacts that it is a bot.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 892, Sec. 1.   (SB 1001)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 17943.)
-------------------------------------------

17942.

(a) The duties and obligations imposed by this chapter are cumulative with any other duties or obligation imposed by any other law.

(b) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application. 

(c) This chapter does not impose a duty on service providers of online platforms, including, but not limited to, Web hosting and Internet service providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 892, Sec. 1.   (SB 1001)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 17943.)
-------------------------------------------

17943.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 892, Sec. 1.   (SB 1001)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. MICROENTERPRISES [18000. - 18001.]

18000.

(a) For purposes of this part, “microenterprise” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Has five or fewer employees, including the owner, who may be part time or full time.

(2) Generally lacks sufficient access to loans, equity, or other
 financial capital.

(b) For purposes of this part, “microenterprise development provider” means a nonprofit organization or public agency that provides self-employment training, technical assistance, and access to microloans to individuals seeking to become self-employed or to a microenterprise seeking to expand its current business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   (AB 674)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

18001.

(a) Every city, county, and city and county is encouraged to access microenterprise development in order to create new jobs and income opportunities for individuals of low and moderate income.

(b) Every city, county, and city and county is encouraged to include microenterprise development as a part of their economic development strategy.

(c) California communities and the public agencies that serve them, such as workforce investment boards, community colleges, and local economic development agencies, are encouraged to promote local partnerships that invest in microenterprise development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 87, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. Independent Contractors [18100. - 18107.]

18100.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Freelance Worker Protection Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18101.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Freelance worker” means a person or organization composed of no more than one person, whether or not incorporated or employing a trade name, that is hired or retained as a bona fide independent contractor by a hiring party to provide professional services in exchange for an amount equal to or greater than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250), either by itself or when aggregated with all contracts for services between the same hiring party and independent contractor during the immediately preceding 120 days.

(b) “Hiring party” means a person or organization in the State of California that retains a freelance worker to provide professional
 services, except any of the following:

(1) The United States government.

(2) The State of California or any subdivision thereof.

(3) A foreign government.

(4) An individual hiring services for the personal benefit of themselves, their family members, or their homestead.

(c) “Professional services” has the same meaning as paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2778 of the Labor Code.

(d) “Public prosecutor” has the same meaning as Section 180 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18102.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, a hiring party shall pay a freelance worker the compensation specified by a contract for professional services:

(1) On or before the date compensation is due pursuant to the contract.

(2) If the contract does not specify when the hiring party shall pay, no later than 30 days after the completion of the freelance worker’s services under the contract.

(b) Once a freelance worker has commenced performance of services under a contract, a hiring party shall not require as a condition of timely payment that the freelance worker do either of the following:

(1) Accept less compensation than the amount of compensation specified by the contract.

(2) Provide more goods or services or grant more intellectual property rights than agreed to in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   (SB 988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18103.

(a) Whenever a hiring party retains the services of a freelance worker, the contract between the hiring party and the freelance worker shall be in writing. The hiring party shall furnish a signed copy of the written contract, either physically or electronically, to the freelance worker. The hiring party shall retain the contract for no less than four years.

(b) The contract shall include, at minimum, all of the following information:

(1) The name and mailing address of each party.

(2) An itemized list of all services to be provided by the freelance worker, including the value of those services and the rate and method
 of compensation.

(3) The date on which the hiring party shall pay the contracted compensation or the mechanism by which the date shall be determined.

(4) The date by which a freelance worker shall submit a list of services rendered under the contract to the hiring party to meet the hiring party’s internal processing deadlines for purposes of timely payment of compensation.
